District of Columbia statutes.
3-1814

Repealed

Licenses or certificates of registration issued pursuant to prior law.

Repealed.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245, § 15, 40 DCR 660
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1236, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-434.